ja: ゼラチン状: カプセル; キューブ; フレーク; 顆粒; パウダー; プレミックスパウダー; シート/リーフ; スプレー; ストリング; その他
de: Form der Gelatine: Kapseln; Würfel; Flocken; Granulat; Pulver; Premix-Pulver; Blätter; Spray; Fäden; Sonstige
th: รูปแบบเจลาติน: แคปซูล; แบบก้อน; ชนิดเกล็ด; ชนิดเม็ด; แบบผง; ผงพรีมิกซ์; แผ่น/ใบ; สเปรย์; เส้น; อื่นๆ
nl: Gelatinevorm: Capsules; Blokjes; Vlokken; Granulaat; Poeder; Premixpoeder; Vellen/blaadjes; Spray; Slierten; Overig
hr-HR: Oblik želatine: Kapsule; Kockice; Pahuljice; Granule; U prahu; Gotova mješavina u prahu; U listićima; Sprej; Trakice; Ostalo
fi: Gelatiinin muoto: Kapselit; Kuutiot; Hiutaleet; Rakeet; Jauhe; Valmisseosjauhe; Levyt/lehdet; Suihke; Nauhat; Muu
ro-RO: Formă gelatină: Capsule; Cuburi; Fulgi; Granule; Pudră; Pudră pre-amestecată; Foi; Spray; Șnururi; Altele
es: Forma de gelatina: Cápsulas; Cubos; Copos; Gránulos; En polvo; Polvo premezclado; Láminas/Hojas; Spray; Hilos; Otra
pt-BR: Forma da gelatina: Cápsulas; Cubos; Flocos; Grânulos; Em pó; Pó pré-misturado; Folhas; Spray; Fios; Outro
lt-LT: Želatinos forma: Kapsulės; Kubeliai; Dribsniai; Granulės; Milteliai; Paruoštas miltelių mišinys; Lakštai / lapeliai; Purškalas; Gijos; Kita
zh-CN: 明胶形态: 胶囊; 块状; 片状; 颗粒; 粉末; 预混粉末; 胶片/叶片状; 喷雾; 条状; 其他
bg-BG: Желатинова форма: Капсули; Кубчета; Люспи; Гранули; На прах; Готова смес на прах; Листове; Спрей; Нишки; Друго
en: Gelatin form: Capsules; Cubes; Flakes; Granules; Powder; Premix powder; Sheets/leaves; Spray; Strings; Other
fr: Forme de la gélatine: Capsules; Cubes; Flocons; Granulés; Poudre; Poudre prémélangée; Feuilles; Aérosol / Vaporisateur; Filaments; Autre
ko: 젤라틴 형태: 캡슐; 큐브; 플레이크; 과립; 가루; 프리믹스 분말; 시트/리프; 스프레이; 스트링; 기타
pt-PT: Forma de gelatina: Cápsulas; Cubos; Flocos; Grânulos; Em pó; Pó pré-misturado; Folhas; Spray; Fios; Outra
zh-TW: 明膠形式: 膠囊; 方塊; 薄片; 顆粒; 粉狀; 預拌粉; 片狀/葉片狀; 噴霧; 條狀; 其他
it: Forma gelatinosa: Capsule; Cubi; Fiocchi; Granuli; In polvere; Premiscela in polvere; Fogli; Spray; Fili; Altro
hu: Zselatin forma: Kapszula; Kocka; Pehely; Granulátum; Por; Előkevert por; Lapzselatin; Spray; Szál; Egyéb
sv: Gelatinform: Kapslar; Kuber; Flingor; Granulat; Pulver; Färdigblandat pulver; Blad; Spray; Trådar; Övrigt
sk-SK: Forma želatíny: Kapsuly; Kocky; Vločky; Granule; Prášok; Prášková zmes; Plátky/listy; Sprej; Vlákna; Iná
cs: Forma želatiny: Kapsle; Kostky; Vločky; Granule; Prášek; Předmíchaný prášek; Plátky/listy; Sprej; Vlákna; Ostatní
sl-SI: Oblika želatina: Kapsule; Kocke; Kosmiči; Zrnca; Prah; Prah v predmešanici; Lističi; Sprej; Vrvice; Drugo
nb: Gelatinform: Kapsler; Terninger; Flak; Granulat; Pulver; Ferdigblandet pulver; Plater/blad; Spray; Tråder; Annet
pl: Forma żelatynowa: Kapsułki; Kostki; Płatki; Granulki; Proszek; Gotowa mieszanka w proszku; W listkach (arkusze); Spray; Nici; Inna
vi: Dạng gelatin: Viên nang; Khối; Mảnh; Hạt; Bột; Bột trộn sẵn; Dạng lá; Xịt; Sợi; Khác
tr: Jelatin formu: Kapsül; Küp; Pul; Granül; Toz; Ön karışım tozu; Tabaka/yaprak; Sprey; İplik; Diğer
ru: Форма желатина: Капсулы; Кубики; Хлопья; Гранулы; Порошок; Порошок-премикс; Листы/пластины; Спрей; Нити; Другое
da: Gelatinens form: Kapsler; Tern; Flager; Granulat; Pulver; Færdigblandet pulver; Plader/blade; Spray; Strimler; Andet
el: Μορφή ζελατίνης: Κάψουλες; Κύβοι; Νιφάδες; Κόκκοι; Σκόνη; Σκόνη προμείγματος; Φύλλα; Σπρέι; Κλωστές; Άλλο